Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION
§ 49-419E. Idaho mountain biking plates.

On and after January 1, 2011, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval, receive special Idaho mountain biking license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho mountain biking license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of the plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in a dedicated fund in the department of parks and recreation or any successor state agency or department thereto which fund shall be used by any such agency or department exclusively for the preservation, maintenance and expansion of recreational trails within the state of Idaho and on which mountain biking is permitted.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of a new registration from the department.

The Idaho mountain biking license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the department of parks and recreation or any successor agency or department thereto, and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho mountain bike trail preservation association.

Sample Idaho mountain biking license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be deposited in a dedicated fund within the department of parks and recreation or any successor state agency or department thereto and which fund shall be used by any such agency or department exclusively for the preservation, maintenance and expansion of recreational trails within the state of Idaho and on which mountain biking is permitted.

§ 49-420. Idaho snowmobile plates.

On and after January 1, 1999, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho snowmobile license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho snowmobile license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the Idaho department of parks and recreation state snowmobile account established pursuant to section 67-7106, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho snowmobile license plate shall be of a color and design comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a red, white and blue background, except that the word “Idaho” shall appear on each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distinguishing designs and slogans, acceptable to the Idaho state snowmobile association, to be added to the plate. The design shall be approved by the department and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho state snowmobile association.

Sample Idaho snowmobile license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited in the state snowmobile account within the department of parks and recreation. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420A. Idaho state capitol commission plates.

On and after January 1, 2002, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special Idaho state capitol commission plates in lieu of regular license plates.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho state capitol commission plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the capitol maintenance reserve fund established in section 67-1610A, Idaho Code, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes of chapter 16, title 67, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, the Idaho state capitol commission license plate shall be of a color and design acceptable to the Idaho state capitol commission, except that the word “Idaho” shall appear on each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distinguishing designs and slogans. The design shall be approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho state capitol commission.

Sample Idaho state capitol commission license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be deposited in the Idaho capitol endowment income fund [capital maintenance reserve fund]. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420B. Lewis and Clark commemorative plates.

On and after January 1, 2001, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special Lewis and Clark commemorative plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Lewis and Clark commemorative plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit to the governor’s Idaho Lewis and Clark trail committee fund created in section 67-8601, Idaho Code, and shall be used exclusively for the purposes described in section 67-8601, Idaho Code.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Lewis and Clark commemorative license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design which features Lewis and Clark and other commemorative aspects of their trail and journeys shall be acceptable to the governor’s Lewis and Clark advisory board, and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid from the Lewis and Clark trail committee fund.

Sample Lewis and Clark commemorative license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the governor’s Idaho Lewis and Clark trail committee fund. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420C. Peace officer memorial plates.

On and after January 1, 2003, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special peace officer memorial license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of peace officer memorial license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Idaho peace officers memorial fund in the Idaho community foundation, and shall be used exclusively for the Idaho law enforcement memorial and families of peace officers killed in the line of duty.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The peace officer memorial license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The distinguishing feature of the license plate shall be a representation of the Idaho peace officer memorial logo. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the Idaho peace officer memorial board, and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho police chiefs association [Idaho chiefs of police association].

Sample peace officer memorial license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho peace officers memorial fund in the Idaho community foundation. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420D. Appaloosa license plates.

On and after January 1, 2003, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other provision of law for which the purchase of a special license plate is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive special Appaloosa license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds. Availability of Appaloosa license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit to the Appaloosa horse club, and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of funding youth horse programs within the state of Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Appaloosa license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design which features an Appaloosa shall be acceptable to the Appaloosa horse club, and shall be approved by the department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Appaloosa horse club.

Sample Appaloosa license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the Appaloosa horse club. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420E. Idaho corvette plates.

On and after January 1, 2003, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho corvette license plates in lieu of regular license plates.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho corvette license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the valley corvettes charitable support fund, and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of supporting charitable activities within the state of Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho corvette license plate shall be of a color and design comparable to the standard issue of license plates with blue numerals on a red, white and blue background, except that the word “Idaho” shall appear on each plate and the county designator shall be omitted to provide for distinguishing designs and slogans, acceptable to the valley corvettes of Idaho, to be added to the plate. The design shall be approved by the department and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the valley corvettes of Idaho.

Sample Idaho corvette license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), ten dollars ($10.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and twenty dollars ($20.00) of which shall be transferred to the valley corvettes charitable support fund. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the valley corvettes charitable support fund.

§ 49-420F. [Reserved.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-420H. Idaho freemason plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 14, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-420I. Earth sciences and lapidary plates. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 233, § 15, effective July 1, 2017.

§ 49-420J. Selway-Bitterroot wilderness plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho Selway-Bitterroot wilderness license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Selway-Bitterroot wilderness plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Selway-Bitterroot [Frank Church] foundation and shall be used by the foundation for the purpose of assisting in the stewardship of the Idaho Selway-Bitterroot wilderness and surrounding wildlands of north central Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The license plate design shall be acceptable to the Selway-Bitterroot [Frank Church] foundation and shall be approved by the department and shall utilize a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Selway-Bitterroot [Frank Church] foundation.

Sample Idaho Selway-Bitterroot wilderness license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the Selway-Bitterroot [Frank Church] foundation.

§ 49-420K. Idaho aviation foundation plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho aviation foundation license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho aviation foundation plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the Idaho aviation foundation and shall be used by the foundation for grants relating to the maintenance, upgrade and development of airstrips and for improving access and promoting safety at backcountry and recreational airports in Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may display the plates on another vehicle only upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The license plate design shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the Idaho aviation foundation and shall be approved by the department and shall use a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho aviation foundation.

Sample Idaho aviation foundation license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the Idaho aviation foundation.

§ 49-420L. Idaho territory sesquicentennial plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho territory sesquicentennial license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho territory sesquicentennial plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited by the department to the respective county historical society or designated entity in which the vehicle is registered and shall be used by such county historical society or designated entity to fund projects related to the Idaho territory sesquicentennial or to fund other projects that protect and preserve the heritage and cultural resources of the county.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may display the plates on another vehicle only upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The license plate design shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be approved by the department and shall use a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Lewiston historic preservation commission.

Sample Idaho territory sesquicentennial license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the county historical society where the vehicle is registered.

§ 49-420M. Idaho 4-H plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive special Idaho 4-H license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho 4-H plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the University of Idaho foundation, friends of 4-H division, and shall be used by the division for 4-H youth development programs across Idaho for the purpose of funding educational 4-H events, securing supplemental resource materials, providing scholarship and leadership training opportunities and integrating additional STEM-based programming into curriculum offerings to better prepare Idaho youth for future careers.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may display the plates on another vehicle only upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The license plate design shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the University of Idaho foundation, friends of 4-H division, and shall be approved by the department and shall use a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the University of Idaho foundation, friends of 4-H division.

Sample Idaho 4-H license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the University of Idaho foundation, friends of 4-H division.

§ 49-420N. Rocky mountain elk foundation plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive rocky mountain elk foundation license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of rocky mountain elk foundation license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit with the rocky mountain elk foundation office in Boise, Idaho, and shall be distributed by the rocky mountain elk foundation, as administrator of the funds, to support efforts of the foundation such as the education of its members and the public about habitat conservation, the value of hunting, hunting ethics and wildlife management, contributions toward habitat enhancement, wildlife management and research projects, promotion of outdoor skills, including shooting, survival and hunting skills programs, as well as the allocation of funds for larger projects and programs of the national rocky mountain elk foundation that benefit Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The rocky mountain elk foundation license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. The design and any slogan on the plate shall be acceptable to the rocky mountain elk foundation and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the rocky mountain elk foundation.

Sample rocky mountain elk foundation license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the rocky mountain elk foundation’s office in Boise, Idaho, and shall be used for purposes as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

§ 49-420O. Idaho friends of the national rifle association plates.

On and after July 1, 2015, any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive Idaho friends of the national rifle association license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho friends of the national rifle association license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit with the national rifle association foundation Idaho state grant fund. The national rifle association foundation Idaho state grant fund is restricted to utilization of received funds within the state of Idaho.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho friends of the national rifle association license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design that features the Idaho friends of the national rifle association design shall be acceptable to the secretary of the national rifle association. The design shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Idaho friends of the national rifle association.

Sample Idaho friends of the national rifle association license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the national rifle association foundation Idaho state grant fund. The national rifle association foundation Idaho state grant fund is restricted to utilization of received funds within the state of Idaho. No additional fee shall be charged for personalizing sample plates.

§ 49-420P. Idaho rotary international plates.

Any person who is the owner of a vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, or registered under any other section of law for which the purchase of special plates is allowed, may apply for and, upon department approval, receive Idaho Rotary International license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. Availability of Idaho Rotary International license plates for other vehicles shall be subject to the rules, policies and procedures of the department.

In addition to the regular registration fee required in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the applicant shall be charged a fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the initial fee and thirteen dollars ($13.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this special license plate program. Twenty-two dollars ($22.00) of each initial fee and twelve dollars ($12.00) of each renewal fee shall be transferred by the state treasurer for deposit with the Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation, which in turn will distribute the funds between the three (3) state districts: Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation, Rotary District 5080 Charitable Programs, Inc., and District 5400 Charitable Programs, Inc. The Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation shall distribute funds generated by license plate purchasers in each district to that district. The moneys shall be used solely for charitable efforts in Idaho, and none can be used for club activities or administrative costs.

Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the owner may transfer the special plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The owner may only display the plates on another vehicle upon receipt of the new registration from the department.

The Idaho Rotary International license plate shall be of a color and design in accordance with the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code. That portion of the design that features the Idaho Rotary International design shall be acceptable to the Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation and shall be approved by the Idaho transportation department utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Initial costs of the plate program, including costs of plate design, shall be paid by the Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation.

Sample Idaho Rotary International license plates may be purchased for a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00), thirteen dollars ($13.00) of which shall be deposited in the state highway account and seventeen dollars ($17.00) of which shall be transferred to the Boise Southwest Rotary Foundation and shall be used for purposes as provided in subsection (2) of this section.